Florida, session 2026, HB1481.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
41
42 Section 1. Section 83.684, Florida Statutes, is created to
43 read:
44 83.684 Homes for Veterans Property Management Incentive
45 Pilot Program.—
46 (1) This section may be cited as the "Homes for Veterans
47 Property Management Incentive Pilot Program."
48 (2) As used in this section, the term:
49 (a) "Corporation" means the Florida Housing Finance
50 Corporation.
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1481-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1481 2026
51 (b) "HUD-Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing program"
52 means a program that combines the United States Department of
53 Housing and Urban Development's housing choice voucher rental
54 assistance for homeless veterans with case management and
55 clinical services provided by the United States Department of
56 Veterans Affairs.
57 (c) "Ledger" means a historical, physical ledger that
58 serves as the official records of a veteran, including a
59 veteran's eligibility for the United States Department of
60 Housing and Urban Development - Veterans Affairs Supportive
61 Housing voucher with subsidy. The term also includes a digitized
62 system that contains and stores the same information as the
63 physical ledger.
64 (d) "Pilot program" means the Homes for Veterans Property
65 Management Incentive Pilot Program.
66 (e) "Veteran" has the same meaning as in s. 1.01(14).
67 (3) The Homes for Veterans Property Management Incentive
68 Pilot Program is established in Broward, Escambia, Hillsborough,
69 and Santa Rosa Counties to provide eligible landlords with
70 incentives to lease eligible dwelling units to veterans who are
71 participating in the HUD-Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing
72 program. Implementation of this pilot program is subject to
73 annual legislative appropriation. The corporation, in
74 consultation with the local public housing authority and case
75 managers assigned to veterans by the United States Department of
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1481-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1481 2026
76 Veterans' Affairs, shall establish and oversee the Vacancy
77 Relief Trust Fund, the Risk Mitigation Trust Fund, the
78 applications for such trust funds, the document requirements,
79 and all processes of the pilot program. The corporation's
80 responsibilities under this section are limited to program
81 administration, including rulemaking, oversight, and
82 establishing and executing contracts with one or more local
83 public housing authorities, contracted program administrators,
84 or other public or nonprofit entities that have experience
85 administering the HUD-Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing
86 program, supportive housing, or landlord mitigation programs to
87 perform intake, documentation review, and claim verification
88 functions to locally administer the funds in the Vacancy Relief
89 Trust Fund and the Risk Mitigation Trust Fund and to distribute
90 funding to the contracted program administrator for payment of
91 approved reimbursement requests. The corporation is not
92 responsible for maintaining eligibility files, tenancy records,
93 or other case-level documentation for the HUD-Veterans Affairs
94 Supportive Housing program. Such functions must be maintained by
95 the contracted program administrator.
96 (4)(a) A landlord who enters into a rental agreement with
97 an eligible veteran may apply to a contracted program
98 administrator to request funding from the Vacancy Relief Trust
99 Fund created under s. 420.56. The purpose of the Vacancy Relief
100 Trust Fund is to allow a landlord to hold a dwelling unit for a
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1481-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1481 2026
101 period of time, and still be compensated for the time that the
102 dwelling unit is vacant, until the veteran is able to move into
103 the dwelling unit. The Vacancy Relief Trust Fund provides
104 proportional rent to eligible landlords for a period of up to 45
105 days after the date the dwelling unit becomes available or until
106 the actual date that the veteran moves into the dwelling unit,
107 whichever is sooner.
108 (b) To apply for the Vacancy Relief Trust Fund, a landlord
109 must submit all required documentation to the contracted program
110 administrator within 60 days after the veteran moves into the
111 dwelling unit. The case manager assigned to the veteran must
112 assist the contracted program administrator by facilitating
113 trust fund requests from landlords and documentation compliance.
114 The contracted program administrator must maintain all
115 documentation required under this subsection and provide the
116 corporation with a certification of eligibility, tenancy dates,
117 and verified costs within the timeframe established by the
118 corporation by rule. At a minimum, a landlord must submit
119 documentation to the contracted program administrator in the
120 form and manner established by the corporation. Required
121 supporting documentation necessary to confirm eligibility for
122 reimbursement and oversight must be maintained by the entity
123 responsible for case management or rental assistance
124 administration in the HUD-Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing
125 program.
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1481-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1481 2026
126 (c) The corporation may rely on certifications,
127 determinations, and documentation provided by public housing
128 authorities, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs,
129 providers of Supportive Services for Veteran Families,
130 continuums of care, or other entities responsible for
131 administering or supporting the functions of the HUD-Veterans
132 Affairs Supportive Housing program. The corporation's reliance
133 on such certifications, determinations, and documentation
134 satisfies the corporation's oversight and evaluation
135 responsibilities of the functions, activities, and outcomes for
136 the pilot program.
137 (5)(a) If a veteran moves out of the dwelling unit during
138 the first 12 months of a year-to-year rental agreement or after
139 the expiration of a rental agreement for any duration, the
140 landlord may apply to the contracted program administrator for
141 funding from the Risk Mitigation Trust Fund created under s.
142 420.56. The Risk Mitigation Trust Fund is designed to cover
143 property loss at the dwelling unit caused by the veteran which
144 extends beyond the amount of the deposit money. The landlord may
145 apply for up to $2,000 beyond the deposit money.
146 (b) To apply for the Risk Mitigation Trust Fund, a
147 landlord must submit all required documentation to the
148 contracted program administrator within 60 days after the
149 veteran moves out of the dwelling unit. The case manager
150 assigned to the veteran must assist the contracted program
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1481-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1481 2026
151 administrator by facilitating trust fund requests from landlords
152 and documentation compliance. The contracted program
153 administrator must maintain all documentation required under
154 this subsection and provide the corporation, within the
155 timeframe established by rule, a certification of eligibility,
156 tenancy dates, verified damage amounts, and verified costs.
157 Required supporting documentation necessary to confirm
158 eligibility for reimbursement and oversight must be maintained
159 by the entity responsible for case management or rental
160 assistance administration in the HUD-Veterans Affairs Supportive
161 Housing program.
162 (c) After the veteran vacates the dwelling unit, the
163 landlord must provide a copy of the move-out checklist with
164 current photos of the dwelling unit and a copy of the written
165 notice provided to the veteran by the landlord in accordance
166 with s. 83.49(3)(a).
167 (d) A landlord may apply for the Risk Mitigation Trust
168 Fund only if the landlord previously applied to the Vacancy
169 Relief Trust Fund.
170 (6) Funding for the pilot program is limited, and the
171 corporation shall award funds on a first-come, first-served
172 basis. The corporation may suspend acceptance of applications
173 when available appropriations are fully obligated. The
174 corporation must notify contracted program administrators if
175 intake of applications is suspended and when intake of
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1481-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1481 2026
176 applications is resumed.
177 (7) The corporation shall adopt rules to implement this
178 section.
179 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, if HB
180 1483 or similar legislation is adopted in the same legislative
181 session or an extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1481-01-c1